Idaho, session 2025, H0057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-402. ANNUAL REGISTRATION. (1) The annual fee for operating each
pickup truck, each neighborhood electric vehicle and each other motor ve-
hicle having a maximum gross weight not in excess of eight thousand (8,000)
pounds and that complies with the federal motor vehicle safety standards as
defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code, shall be:
Vehicles one (1) and two (2) years old .........................$69.00
Vehicles three (3) and four (4) years old ......................$57.00
Vehicles five (5) and six (6) years old ........................$57.00
Vehicles seven (7) and eight (8) years old .....................$45.00
Vehicles over eight (8) years old .............................$45.00
There shall be twelve (12) registration periods, starting in January
for holders of validation registration stickers numbered 1, and proceed-
ing consecutively through December for holders of validation registration
stickers numbered 12, each of which shall start on the first day of a calendar
month and end on the last day of the twelfth month from the first day of the
beginning month. Registration periods shall expire midnight on the last day
of the registration period in the year designated by the validation regis-
tration sticker. The numeral digit on the validation registration stickers
shall, as does the registration card, fix the registration period under the
staggered registration system for the purpose of reregistration and notice
of expiration.
A vehicle that has once been registered for any of the above-designated
periods shall, upon reregistration, be registered for the period bearing the
same number, and the registration card shall show and be the exclusive proof
of the expiration date of registration and licensing. Vehicles may be ini-
tially registered for less than a twelve (12) month period, or for more than a
twelve (12) month period, and the fee prorated on a monthly basis if the frac-
tional registration tends to fulfill the purpose of the monthly series reg-
istration system.
(2) For all school buses operated either by a nonprofit, nonpublic
school or operated pursuant to a service contract with a school district for


transporting children to or from school or in connection with school-ap-
proved activities, the annual fee shall be twenty-four dollars ($24.00) and
shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration
and notice of expiration.
(3) For all motorcycles and motor-driven cycles that comply with the
federal motor vehicle safety standards, operated upon the public highways,
the annual fee shall be nineteen dollars ($19.00) and shall be subject to
staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of ex-
piration.
(4) For operation of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or
motorbike, excluding a motorbike with an engine displacement of fifty (50)
cubic centimeters or less, on city, county or highway district roads or
highways open to such use, a restricted vehicle license plate fee pursuant
to section 49-450, Idaho Code, shall be paid. In addition, the certifi-
cate of number fee specified in section 67-7122, Idaho Code, shall be paid
as provided in section 67-7122, Idaho Code. The certificate of number and
restricted vehicle license plate exemption provided in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code, applies to all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, motor-
bikes and motorcycles used for the purposes described in section 49-426(2),
Idaho Code. Nonresidents shall be allowed to purchase a restricted vehicle
license plate and validation sticker pursuant to section 67-7124, Idaho
Code, for an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, or motorbike.
(5) For all motor homes, the fee shall be as specified in subsection (1)
of this section and shall be in addition to the fees provided for in section
49-445, Idaho Code.
(6) Registration fees shall not be subject to refund.
(7) A financial institution or repossession service contracted to
a financial institution repossessing vehicles under the terms of a secu-
rity agreement shall move the vehicle from the place of repossession to the
financial institution's place of business on a repossession plate. The
repossession plate shall also be used for demonstrating the vehicle to a
prospective purchaser for a period not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours. The
registration fees for repossession plates shall be as required in subsection
(1) of this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other
fees required under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to
the registration fee. The repossession plate shall be subject to staggered
registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(8) A wrecker or towing business engaged in the process of towing motor-
ized vehicles that have been wrecked, abandoned, salvaged or may be disabled
may apply for a wrecker plate to be displayed on those vehicles being towed,
provided the power unit is properly registered under this chapter. The reg-
istration fees for wrecker plates shall be as required in subsection (1) of
this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other fees re-
quired under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to the reg-
istration fee and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose
of reregistration and notice of expiration.
(9) In addition to the annual registration fee in this section, there
shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and an an-
nual program fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for all special license plate
programs for those license plates issued pursuant to sections 49-404A,


49-407, 49-408, 49-409, 49-414, 49-416, 49-418 and 49-418D, Idaho Code. For
special plates issued pursuant to sections 49-406 and 49-406A, Idaho Code,
there shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but
there shall be no annual renewal fee. For special plates issued pursuant
to sections 49-415D, 49-417, 49-417A, 49-417B, 49-417C, 49-417D, 49-418A,
49-418B, 49-418C, 49-419, 49-419A, 49-419C, 49-419E, 49-420, 49-420A,
49-420B, 49-420C, 49-420D, 49-420E, 49-420J, 49-420K, 49-420L, 49-420M,
49-420N, 49-420O, 49-420P, 49-420Q, 49-420R, and 49-420S, Idaho Code, and
any new special plate program effective on and after January 1, 2013, pur-
suant to section 49-402D, Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee
of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) and an annual program fee of twenty-five
dollars ($25.00). The fees contained in this subsection shall be applicable
to all new special plate programs and shall be subject to staggered registra-
tion for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration. The initial
program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state high-
way account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of special
license plate programs, unless otherwise specified by law.
(10) Any vehicle that does not meet federal motor vehicle safety stan-
dards shall not be registered and shall not be permitted to operate on public
highways of the state, as defined in section 40-117, Idaho Code, unless oth-
erwise specifically authorized.
(11)(a) In addition to annual registration fees as provided in this
section, registrants may pay a fee to purchase an Idaho state parks and
trails passport authorizing resident motor vehicle entry into all Idaho
state parks. Registrants may pay the fee for a one (1) year or two (2)
year period of time. The fee shall be ten dollars ($10.00) twenty dol-
lars ($20.00) for one (1) year and twenty dollars ($20.00) forty dollars
($40.00) for two (2) years. All fees collected pursuant to this subsec-
tion shall be deposited into the park and recreation fund and shall be
subject to appropriation. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection
shall not be considered a motor vehicle registration fee as provided in
section 17, article VII, of the constitution of the state of Idaho.
(b) Sixteen dollars ($16.00) from each one (1) year passport and
thirty-two dollars ($32.00) from each two (2) year passport shall be
deposited into the park and recreation fund and shall be subject to ap-
propriation. Four dollars ($4.00) from each one (1) year passport and
eight dollars ($8.00) from each two (2) year passport shall be deposited
into the nonmotorized recreation fund established in section 67-7134,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 71, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-7134, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-7134. NONMOTORIZED RECREATION FUND -- ESTABLISHMENT OF FUND -- USE
OF MONEYS IN FUND. (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury a
fund to be known as the "nonmotorized recreation fund," into which the moneys
specified in section 49-402(11), Idaho Code, shall be deposited.
(2) The department of parks and recreation shall administer the nonmo-
torized recreation fund. The moneys derived from this fund shall be used as
follows:


(a) For the securing of special leases, use licenses, recreation ease-
ments, or permits or for the actual purchase of land under private,
state, or federal ownership to be used for public recreational nonmo-
torized activity;
(b) For the securing, maintenance, construction, or development of
trails and other public recreational facilities enhancing nonmotorized
use on private, state, and federal lands;
(c) To finance the formulation and implementation, under the park and
recreation board's direction, of a nonmotorized user education pro-
gram;
(d) To acquire applicable matching federal funds;
(e) To enforce the laws and regulations governing nonmotorized recre-
ational opportunities in the state of Idaho; and
(f) To distribute to governmental entities, Indian tribes, and non-
governmental organizations through an annual grant process determined
by the department. No more than fifty percent (50%) of moneys derived
from the fund shall be used for the grants described in this paragraph.
(3) The department shall annually publish a report identifying the
use of revenues generated from Idaho state parks and trails passport fees
collected and allocated to nonmotorized recreation pursuant to section
49-402(11), Idaho Code.
(4) Allocation of passport fees for nonmotorized recreation shall not
impose any additional liability on the state of Idaho or any of its political
subdivisions, and those entities and persons shall retain the limitations of
liability provided by section 36-1604, Idaho Code, regardless of the use of
such fees.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.